dictionaries/pt_PT.aff
SFX s Y 36
SFX s   o               íssimo          [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   co              quíssimo        co              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   ço              císsimo         ço              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   go              guíssimo        go              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   e               íssimo          e               +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   0               íssimo          [lr]            +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   ês              esíssimo        ês              +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   z               císsimo         z               +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   ável            abilíssimo      ável            +GR=sup,G=m,N=s
SFX s   o               íssima          [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   co              quíssima        co              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   ço              císsima         ço              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   go              guíssima        go              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   e               íssima          e               +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   0               íssima          [lr]            +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   ês              esíssima        ês              +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   z               císsima         z               +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   ável            abilíssima      ável            +GR=sup,G=f,N=s
SFX s   o               íssimos         [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   co              quíssimos       co              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   ço              císsimos        ço              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   go              guíssimos       go              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   e               íssimos         e               +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   0               íssimos         [lr]            +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   ês              esíssimos       ês              +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   z               císsimos        z               +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   ável            abilíssimos     ável            +GR=sup,N=p
SFX s   o               íssimas         [^cçg]o         +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   co              quíssimas       co              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   ço              císsimas        ço              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   go              guíssimas       go              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   e               íssimas         e               +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   0               íssimas         [lr]            +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   ês              esíssimas       ês              +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   z               císsimas        z               +GR=sup,G=f,N=p
SFX s   ável            abilíssimas     ável            +GR=sup,G=f,N=p

SFX d Y 30
SFX d   o               idade           [^çgi]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ço              cidade          ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   go              guidade         go              +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   o               edade           [^r]io          +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   o               edade           [^áó]rio        +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ário            ariedade        ário            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ório            oriedade        ório            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   e               idade           e               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   0               idade           r               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   0               idade           [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   vel             bilidade        [^áíú]vel       +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ável            abilidade       ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ível            ibilidade       ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   úvel            ubilidade       úvel            +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   z               cidade          z               +CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd
SFX d   o               idades          [^çgi]o         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ço              cidades         ço              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   go              guidades        go              +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   o               edades          [^r]io          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   o               edades          [^áó]rio        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ário            ariedades       ário            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ório            oriedades       ório            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   e               idades          e               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   0               idades          r               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   0               idades          [^v][^q]l       +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   vel             bilidades       [^áí]vel        +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ável            abilidades      ável            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   ível            ibilidades      ível            +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   úvel            ubilidades      úvel            +CAR=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd
SFX d   z               cidades         z               +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd

SFX i Y 24
SFX i   o               ismo            [^cçã]o         +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   co              quismo          co              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ço              cismo           ço              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ção             cionismo        ção             +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   a               ismo            [^icg]a         +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   a               smo             ia              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ca              quismo          ca              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ga              guismo          ga              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   e               ismo            e               +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   0               ismo            [lr]            +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ês              esismo          ês              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   m               nismo           m               +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   o               ismos           [^cçã]o         +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   co              quismos         co              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ço              cismos          ço              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ção             cionismos       ção             +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   a               ismos           [^icg]a         +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   a               smos            ia              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ca              quismos         ca              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ga              guismos         ga              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   e               ismos           e               +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   0               ismos           [lr]            +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   ês              esismos         ês              +FSEM=ismo
SFX i   m               nismos          m               +FSEM=ismo
